Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,168
Abandonment of a merger or share
exchange.

(MBCA
11.08) (a) Unless otherwise provided in a plan of merger or share exchange
or in the laws under which a foreign business corporation or a domestic or
foreign eligible entity that is a party to a merger or a share exchange is
organized or by which it is governed, after the plan has been adopted and
approved as required by sections 21-2,161 to 21-2,168, and at any time before
the merger or share exchange has become effective, it may be abandoned by
a domestic business corporation that is a party thereto without action by
its shareholders in accordance with any procedures set forth in the plan of
merger or share exchange or, if no such procedures are set forth in the plan,
in the manner determined by the board of directors, subject to any contractual
rights of other parties to the merger or share exchange.

(b) If a merger or share
exchange is abandoned under subsection (a) of this section after articles
of merger or share exchange have been filed with the Secretary of State but
before the merger or share exchange has become effective, a statement that
the merger or share exchange has been abandoned in accordance with this section,
signed on behalf of a party to the merger or share exchange by an officer
or other duly authorized representative, shall be delivered to the Secretary
of State for filing prior to the effective date of the merger or share exchange.
Upon filing, the statement shall take effect and the merger or share exchange
shall be deemed abandoned and shall not become effective.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 168.